incubator/apertium-cy-kw.kw.dix
    <pardef n="carr/ek__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ygy</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lo__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yow</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="t/oll__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>oll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oll</l>
          <r>oll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="b/arth__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arth</l>
          <r>arth<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yrth</l>
          <r>arth<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="scovarn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dyw</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="noy__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tanbren__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yer</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="boll/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fenest/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ry</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pol__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>low</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/avas__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avas</l>
          <r>avas<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eves</l>
          <r>avas<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quartr/on__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="le/f__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vow</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="myghtern__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eth</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amary__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Saws__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mesv/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edhy</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="b/ys__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esyas</l>
          <r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bar/f__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vow</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fa/ven__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>ven<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ven</l>
          <r>ven<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lad/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ron</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gaj/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jys</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ty/ak__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ak</l>
          <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogyon</l>
          <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bagas__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gwenn/ol__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ol</l>
          <r>ol<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yly</l>
          <r>ol<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/ap__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ap</l>
          <r>ap<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ebyon</l>
          <r>ap<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="benen__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="me/n__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yn</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="yet__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tys</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="davas"><par n="initial-d"/><i></i><par n="d/avas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="als"><i>als</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scovarn"><i>scovarn</i><par n="scovarn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="quartron"><i>quartr</i><par n="quartr/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hanaf"><i>hana</i><par n="le/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="toll"><par n="initial-t"/><i></i><par n="t/oll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lef"><i>le</i><par n="le/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="men"><par n="initial-m"/><i>e</i><par n="me/n__n"/></e>
    <e lm="owraval"><i>owraval</i><par n="pol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bolla"><par n="initial-b"/><i>oll</i><par n="boll/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gwaf"><i>Gwa</i><par n="le/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hansel"><i>hansel</i><par n="pol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="melyn"><par n="initial-m"/><i>elyn</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gaja"><par n="initial-g"/><i>aj</i><par n="gaj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mesva"><par n="initial-m"/><i>esv</i><par n="mesv/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="busaf"><par n="initial-b"/><i>usa</i><par n="le/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lo"><i>lo</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="faven"><i>fa</i><par n="fa/ven__n"/></e>
    <e lm="noy"><i>noy</i><par n="noy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tyak"><par n="initial-t"/><i>y</i><par n="ty/ak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eglos"><i>eglos</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bottel"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ottel</i><par n="pol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="carrek"><i>carr</i><par n="carr/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caltor"><i>caltor</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lader"><i>lad</i><par n="lad/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spycer"><i>spycer</i><par n="amary__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skyber"><i>skyber</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Haf"><i>Ha</i><par n="le/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barf"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ar</i><par n="bar/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yet"><i>yet</i><par n="yet__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elgeth"><i>elgeth</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scol"><i>scol</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pol"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ol</i><par n="pol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Saws"><i>Saws</i><par n="Saws__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pows"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ows</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atalgyst"><i>atalgyst</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amary"><i>amary</i><par n="amary__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pel"><par n="initial-p"/><i>el</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plu"><par n="initial-p"/><i>lu</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aval"><i>aval</i><par n="pol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stevel"><i>stevel</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fenester"><i>fenest</i><par n="fenest/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barth"><par n="initial-b"/><i></i><par n="b/arth__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bownder"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ownder</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
